Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-189
Vehicle identification inspections;
superintendent; duty.

The superintendent shall, from time
to time, provide each county treasurer and
each sheriff with a list of persons holding then current certificates of training.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 89;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 52.